Utah statutes.
58-72-304.   Exceptions from licensure.

In addition to the exemptions from licensure set forth in Section 58-1-307, the following persons may engage in the practice of acupuncture subject to the stated circumstances and limitations without being licensed under this chapter:

(1)  an individual licensed as a physician and surgeon or osteopathic physician and surgeon under Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act, and Chapter 68, Utah Osteopathic Medical Practice Act;

(2)  a commissioned physician or surgeon serving in the armed forces of the United States or other federal agency; and

(3)  a chiropractic physician licensed under Chapter 73, Chiropractic Physician Practice Act.  A chiropractic physician may not claim to be a licensed acupuncturist without acupuncturist licensure.

